Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1874SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 450 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Develop and distribute to school 3 districts, accredited nonpublic schools, charter schools, and 4 innovation zone schools family-centered resources to support 5 student development of mathematics knowledge at home. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 70. Provide teachers who are employed 7 by schools most in need of support, as identified by the 8 department, with evidence-based professional development 9 services related to implementing high-quality mathematics 10 instruction. When determining whether a school is in need of 11 support under this subsection, the director shall consider the 12 level of mathematics proficiency attained by students enrolled 13 in the school and the amount of resources available to the 14 department to provide the professional development services. 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 71. On or before July 1, 2025, develop and 16 distribute to school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, 17 charter schools, and innovation zone schools a comprehensive 18 state mathematics plan that is designed to increase the 19 level of mathematics proficiency attained by students using 20 systematic and sequential approaches to teaching subitizing, 21 cardinality, object counting, verbal counting, spatial 22 relationships, benchmark numbers, and part-part-whole models. 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 72. Develop and publish on the departmentâs 24 internet site a list of valid and reliable mathematics 25 screeners that may be used by teachers to identify students 26 enrolled in kindergarten through grade six who may require 27 additional instruction or support in mathematics. 28 Sec. 2. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 29 by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . o. Include preparation in methods for 31 teaching mathematics. A higher education institution providing 32 practitioner preparation may satisfy this requirement by 33 requiring students admitted to an approved practitioner 34 preparation program who will be teaching mathematics to 35 -1- LSB 1874SV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 450 students enrolled in kindergarten through grade twelve to 1 complete mathematics methods coursework and demonstrate 2 competency in number sense, learning progressions, conceptual 3 understanding, and procedural fluency and application in 4 mathematics, including the implementation of high-quality 5 instructional materials aligned to Iowa academic standards for 6 mathematics. 7 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.68A Student progression ââ 8 mathematics proficiency. 9 1. Each school district shall assess all students enrolled 10 in kindergarten through grade six at least three times each 11 school year to determine the studentsâ level of mathematics 12 proficiency by administering a mathematics screener that is on 13 the list developed by the department of education pursuant to 14 section 256.9, subsection 72. 15 2. If, as the result of the assessments administered 16 pursuant to subsection 1, a school district determines that 17 a student is persistently at risk in mathematics, the school 18 district shall do all of the following: 19 a. Assess the studentâs level of proficiency in mathematics 20 at least every other week and implement mathematics 21 interventions and supports. 22 b. Develop, in consultation with the studentâs parents or 23 guardians, a personalized mathematics plan that identifies 24 interventions and supports that will be used to help the 25 student achieve proficiency in mathematics. 26 c. If the student is meeting expectations related to 27 increases in the studentâs level of mathematics proficiency, 28 provide the student with small group interventions. 29 d. If the student is not meeting expectations related to 30 increases in the studentâs level of mathematics proficiency, 31 provide the student with intensive interventions. 32 3. A school district shall provide the assessments, plans, 33 and interventions described in subsection 2 to students 34 enrolled in kindergarten through grade six who are persistently 35 -2- LSB 1874SV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 450 at risk in mathematics until the student performs at benchmark 1 on the statewide summative assessment in mathematics or 2 until the student performs at benchmark on two consecutive 3 assessments administered pursuant to subsection 1, whichever 4 occurs first. 5 4. For purposes of this section, âpersistently at riskâ 6 means the student has not met the grade-level benchmark on two 7 consecutive assessments administered pursuant to subsection 1. 8 5. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 9 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 10 Sec. 4. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 11 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 12 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 13 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 14 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 15 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 16 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 17 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 18 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 19 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 20 districts. 21 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 22 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 23 The portion of the section of this Act enacting section 24 256.9, subsection 71. 25